Maryland, session 2026, HB1464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
8–310.1.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1464*

HOUSE BILL 1464
AN ADMINISTRATOR OF A PLAN THAT PROVIDES HEALTH BENEFITS SHALL
DEVELOP A STREAMLINED PROCESS THROUGH WHICH:
(1) A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER CAN REQUEST WHETHER AN
ENROLLEE IS ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE A COVERED HEALTH CARE SERVICE UNDER THE
PLAN; AND
(2) THE ADMINISTRATOR CAN RESPOND IN A TIMELY MANNER TO ANY
ELIGIBILITY REQUEST MADE UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SECTION.
15–1008.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Carrier” means:
(i) an insurer;
(ii) a nonprofit health service plan;
(iii) a health maintenance organization;
(iv) a dental plan organization;
(v) a managed care organization, as defined in § 15–101 of the
Health – General Article; or
(vi) any other person that provides health benefit plans subject to
regulation by the State.
(3) “Code” means:
(i) the applicable current procedural terminology (CPT) code, as
adopted by the American Medical Association;
(ii) if for a dental service, the applicable code adopted by the
American Dental Association; or
(iii) another applicable code under an appropriate uniform coding
scheme used by a carrier in accordance with this section.
(4) “Coding guidelines” means those standards or procedures used or
applied by a payor to determine the most accurate and appropriate code or codes for
payment by the payor for a service or services.

HOUSE BILL 1464 3
(5) “Health care provider” means a person or entity licensed, certified or
otherwise authorized under the Health Occupations Article or the Health – General Article
to provide health care services.
(6) “Reimbursement” means payments made to a health care provider by a
carrier on either a fee–for–service, capitated, or premium basis.
(b) This section does not apply to an adjustment to reimbursement:
(1) made as part of an annual contracted reconciliation of a risk sharing
arrangement under an administrative service provider contract; or
(2) made as part of a two–sided incentive arrangement that complies with
§ 15–113 of this title.
(c) (1) If a carrier retroactively denies reimbursement to a health care
provider, the carrier:
(i) may only retroactively deny reimbursement for services subject
to coordination of benefits with another carrier, the Maryland Medical Assistance Program,
or the Medicare Program during the 18–month period after the date that the carrier paid
the health care provider; and
(ii) except as provided in item (i) of this paragraph, may only
retroactively deny reimbursement during the 6–month period after the date that the carrier
paid the health care provider.
(2) (i) A carrier that retroactively denies reimbursement to a health
care provider under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall provide the health care provider
with a written statement specifying the basis for the retroactive denial.
(ii) If the retroactive denial of reimbursement results from
coordination of benefits by a carrier that is not a managed care organization, the written
statement shall provide the name and address of the entity acknowledging responsibility
for payment of the denied claim.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a carrier [that does not
comply with the provisions of subsection (c) of this section] may not retroactively deny
reimbursement or attempt in any manner to retroactively collect reimbursement already
paid to a health care provider IF:
(1) THE CARRIER DOES NOT COMPLY WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION; OR
(2) BEFORE PROVIDING THE SERVICE, THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER
INQUIRED IN GOOD FAITH ABOUT THE ENROLLEE’S ELIGIBILITY UNDER § 8–310.1

HOUSE BILL 1464
OF THIS ARTICLE AND RECEIVED CONFIRMATION FROM THE THIRD–PARTY
ADMINISTRATOR THAT THE ENROLLEE WAS ELIGIBLE FOR THE SERVICE,
REGARDLESS OF THE ENROLLEE’S ACTUAL ELIGIBILITY STATUS.
(e) (1) The provisions of subsection (c)(1) of this section do not apply if a carrier
retroactively denies reimbursement to a health care provider because:
(i) the information submitted to the carrier was fraudulent;
(ii) the information submitted to the carrier was improperly coded
and the carrier has provided to the health care provider sufficient information regarding
the coding guidelines used by the carrier at least 30 days prior to the date the services
subject to the retroactive denial were rendered;
(iii) the claim submitted to the carrier was a duplicate claim; or
(iv) for a claim submitted to a managed care organization, the claim
was for services provided to a Maryland Medical Assistance Program recipient during a
time period for which the Program has permanently retracted the capitation payment for
the Program recipient from the managed care organization.
(2) Information submitted to the carrier may be considered to be
improperly coded under paragraph (1) of this subsection if the information submitted to the
carrier by the health care provider:
(i) uses codes that do not conform with the coding guidelines used
by the carrier applicable as of the date the service or services were rendered; or
(ii) does not otherwise conform with the contractual obligations of
the health care provider to the carrier applicable as of the date the service or services were
rendered.
(f) If a carrier retroactively denies reimbursement for services as a result of
coordination of benefits under provisions of subsection (c)(1)(i) of this section, the health
care provider shall have 6 months from the date of denial, unless a carrier permits a longer
time period, to submit a claim for reimbursement for the service to the carrier, Maryland
Medical Assistance Program, or Medicare Program responsible for payment.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.